District of Columbia statutes.
2-205.01

Insurance of District property.

After February 25, 1885, property belonging to the District of Columbia may be insured in advance for periods of 5 years or less.

History

Feb. 25, 1885, 23 Stat. 313, ch. 145

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1118.
1973 Ed., § 1-816.